Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 32 University of Rhode Island
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-32-1.
Change of former name.

Where in any existing law reference is made to Rhode Island State College, the term “University of Rhode Island” shall be used in lieu of this term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-1

.

16-32-2.
Board of Trustees established.

There is hereby created a board of trustees for the university of Rhode Island, sometimes referred to as the “board” or “board of trustees,” which shall be and is constituted a public corporation, empowered to sue and be sued in its own name; to borrow money; to compromise and settle claims; to have a seal; and to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; and to exercise all the powers, in addition to those specifically enumerated in this chapter, usually appertaining to public corporations entrusted with control of postsecondary educational institutions and functions. Upon its organization, the board shall be vested with the legal title to all property, real and personal, now owned by and/or under the control or in the custody of the council on postsecondary education for the use of the university of Rhode Island, including all its departments, divisions, and branches, sometimes referred to as the property.

The board is empowered to hold and operate the property in trust for the state; to acquire, hold, and dispose of the property and other like property as deemed necessary for the execution of its corporate purposes. The board is made successor to all powers, rights, duties, and privileges for the university of Rhode Island formerly belonging to the council on postsecondary education pertaining to postsecondary education and the board of governors for higher education.

The board shall be the employer of record for the university. It shall retain all authority formerly vested in the council on postsecondary education and the board of education regarding the employment of faculty and staff at the university of Rhode Island. The board shall appoint the president of the university and shall review their performance on an annual basis.

The board is empowered to enter into contracts and agreements with the council on postsecondary education and/or the department of administration related to employee benefits, including but not limited to retirement benefits, health, dental, vision and life insurance, disability insurance, workers’ compensation, and tuition waivers to maximize the state’s and university’s purchasing and investment portfolio and educational opportunities for the benefit of its employees.

The board is empowered to enter into collective bargaining agreements as appropriate with its employees and all existing collective bargaining agreements in effect when the board is established pursuant to §

16-32-2.2

shall be transferred from the council on postsecondary education to the board.

The board shall make rules and regulations for the control and use of all public properties and highways under its care, and for violations of those rules and regulations; penalties, up to one hundred dollars ($100) and costs for any one offense, may be imposed by any district court or police court in the city or town where the violation occurs; and, in general, the board shall take all actions necessary for the proper execution of the powers and duties granted to, and imposed upon, the board by the terms of this chapter.

The board shall make rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 2 of title 37 to implement its responsibilities as a public agency for procurement purposes as defined in §

37-2-7(16)

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

37-2-22

, small procurements made by the board and the university shall not exceed an aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for construction and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for all other purchases, regardless of the source of funding, and shall be made in accordance with small purchase regulations promulgated by the board. These thresholds may be increased annually through an amendment to the small purchase regulations promulgated by the board of trustees, to reflect the annual increase in the federal Consumer Price Index published by the United States Department of Labor from the date of any prior adjustment.

The board shall evaluate data on which to base performance of the university as described in subsection (g) of this section which shall be defined by the president of the university. These measures may include and incorporate outcomes or goals from multiple, previous years. The lack of information from previous years, however, will not affect the use of performance-based measures.

The university of Rhode Island shall have unique measures consistent with its purpose, role, scope, and mission. The board shall provide faculty and students an opportunity to provide input on the development of performance measures.

The performance-based measures shall include, but not be limited to, the following metrics:

The number and percentage, including growth in relation to enrollment and prior years of bachelor’s degrees awarded to first-time, full-time students within four (4) years and six (6) years, including summer graduates;

The number of degrees awarded that are tied to Rhode Island’s high demand, high-wage employment opportunities consistent with the institution’s mission;

One metric that applies only to the university, in consultation with the president, which shall consider faculty, staff, and student input; and

Any other metrics that are deemed appropriate by the board.

Weight may be assigned to any of the aforementioned metrics to reinforce the mission of the university, the economic needs of the state, and the socio-economic status of the students.

The board shall hold the university accountable for developing and implementing transfer pathways for students from the community college of Rhode Island and Rhode Island college.

The board shall adopt a process requiring every academic program at the university to accept for credit the advanced placement subject test scores of students who obtain a three (3) or better in any advanced placement course.

The board shall supervise, coordinate, and/or authorize audits, civil and administrative investigations, and inspections or oversight reviews, when necessary, relating to expenditure of state or federal funds, or to any and all university programs and operations, as well as the procurement of any supplies, services, or construction, by the university. In the course of an audit or investigation, the board authorized auditor(s) shall review statutes and regulations of the university and shall determine if the university is in compliance and shall make recommendations concerning the efficiency of operations, and the effect of such statutes or regulations on internal controls and the prevention and detection of fraud, waste, and abuse. The board authorized auditor(s) may recommend policies or procedures that may strengthen internal controls, or assist in the prevention or detection of fraud, waste, and abuse or mismanagement. Any audits conducted shall be transmitted to the office of internal audit established in chapter 7.1 of title 35.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-2

; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 53; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 155, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 156, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 352, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 353, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

16-32-2.1.
Additional powers of the President of the University.

In addition to any powers granted to the president of the university of Rhode Island by law or regulation, and consistent with shared governance practices, in conformity with §

16-32-10

, the president shall have the following additional powers and duties:

To create and consolidate departments, divisions, programs, and courses of study within the university and the approved role and scope of the president’s authority adopted by the board of trustees. Any new or proposed eliminations of departments, divisions, programs, or courses of study that are outside the role and scope approved by the board shall require the review and approval of the board.

To adopt a budget for the university and submit it to the board of trustees for approval.

To be responsible for the general management of property of the university.

To recommend to the board of trustees, tables of organization for the university.

To submit to the board of trustees and to compile and analyze the following information for presentation to the board annually by May 1st the following:

A detailed departmental breakdown of all faculty members employed at the university by rank (including all professors, associate professors, assistant professors, lecturers, and instructors) and tenure (tenured and non-tenured, and other) and by race (African American, Hispanic, Native American, and Asian) and gender.

A detailed report on current student enrollments for each class at the university by race and gender, by academic department, and by outreach program (e.g. talent development), guaranteed admissions program, and the current levels of funding and staff support for each of these programs.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.]

A plan for recruitment of African American and Hispanic faculty into tenure track positions at the university with specific reference to and planned involvement with the New England higher education’s minority faculty recruitment and development plan.

Copies of the report shall be furnished to the board of trustees.

To assist the board of trustees in preparation and maintenance of a three-year (3) strategic funding plan for the university; to assist the board in the preparation and presentation annually to the state budget officer in accordance with §

35-3-4

of a total university budget.

To monitor, publish, and report to the board of trustees the level of performance on all metrics of the universities set forth in §

16-32-2

and in accordance with this chapter. The president shall revise the metrics at a time when performance has reached a level pre-defined by the board. Future metrics may further goals identified by the board, the board of education, and the governor’s workforce board, and the purpose and mission of the university. The university shall publish its performance on all of its associated metrics prescribed in this chapter on its website.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-2.2.
Appointment and removal of the board of trustees.

There is hereby established a board of trustees for the university of Rhode Island consisting of seventeen (17) members. The governor shall appoint the initial members, with the advice and consent of the senate, to serve on the board of trustees, until the expiration of their term and their successor is appointed. In making these appointments the governor shall give due consideration to recommendations from the president of the university of Rhode Island and at least three (3) of those members appointed by the governor shall be residents of the state of Rhode Island, at least one of those members shall be selected from a list of names of at least five (5) individuals submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives, and at least one of those members shall be selected from a list of names of at least five (5) individuals submitted by the president of the senate. In addition, the president of the university of Rhode Island shall appoint one faculty member and one student member who shall be a full-time student in good standing at the university and who shall both serve in a non-voting, ex officio capacity for a single two-year (2) term. The president of the university of Rhode Island, the chair of the board of education, and the chair of the council on postsecondary education shall serve in a non-voting, ex-officio capacity on the board of trustees. Six (6) of the members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve terms of three (3) years; seven (7) members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve terms of two (2) years, including the member appointed from the list submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives and the member appointed from the list submitted by the president of the senate; and, four (4) members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve terms of one year. A majority of voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum and the vote of a majority of those present and voting shall be required for action.

After the initial terms of appointment have expired, the governor shall appoint seventeen (17) members with the advice and consent of the senate to serve as members of the board of trustees. In making these appointments the governor shall give due consideration to recommendations from the president of the university and the chair of the board of trustees of the university of Rhode Island and at least three (3) of those members appointed by the governor shall be residents of the state of Rhode Island, at least one of those members shall be selected after due consideration of a list of names of at least five (5) individuals submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives, and at least one of those members shall be selected after due consideration of a list of names of at least five (5) individuals submitted by the president of the senate. All members shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years and shall be eligible for reappointment. In addition, the president of the university of Rhode Island shall appoint one faculty member and one student member who shall be a full-time student in good standing at the university and who shall both serve in a non-voting, ex officio capacity. The faculty member shall serve for a single two-year (2) term. The student member shall serve for up to two (2) one-year terms. The president of the university of Rhode Island, the chair of the board of education, and the chair of the council on postsecondary education shall serve in a non-voting, ex officio capacity on the board of trustees.

A majority of the board shall elect the chair of the board from among the seventeen (17) voting board members pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board establishing the procedure for electing a chair.

Members of the board shall be removable by the governor for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful. In making decisions to remove a member, the governor shall give due consideration to recommendations from the chair of the board of trustees of the university of Rhode Island. No removal shall be made for any cause except after ten (10) days’ notice in writing of specific charges, with opportunity for the member to be present in person and with counsel at a public hearing before the appointing authority, to introduce witnesses and documentary evidence in the member’s own defense, and to confront and cross-examine adversary witnesses; and appeal shall lie to the superior court from the governor’s determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 8; P.L. 2022, ch. 229, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 230, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

16-32-3.
Purposes of university.

The board, as now constituted, and their successors, for the terms for which they have been or for which they hereafter may be appointed regents, shall continue to be a body politic and corporate for the purpose of continuing and maintaining the University of Rhode Island as a university where the leading object shall be, without excluding other scientific and classical studies, and including military tactics, to teach any branches of learning as are related to agriculture and the mechanic arts, in order to promote the liberal and practical education of the industrial classes in the several pursuits and professions of life, as provided in the act of the congress of the United States, approved July 2, 1862, entitled “An Act Donating Public Lands to the Several States and Territories Which May Provide Colleges for the Benefit of Agriculture and the Mechanic Arts,” and for the purpose of continuing and maintaining an agricultural experiment station as a department of the college under and in accordance with, and to carry out the purposes of, the act of congress approved March 2, 1887, entitled “An Act to Establish Agricultural Experiment Stations in Connection with the Colleges Established in the Several States Under the Provisions of An Act Approved July 2, 1862, and of the Acts Supplementary Thereto.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 66, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1909, ch. 417, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-3

.

16-32-4.
Location — Application of federal funds.

The university and experiment station shall, until ordered, continue to be located in the town of South Kingstown upon the estate now occupied by them, and all money received after this under the act of congress, approved March 2, 1887, and under the act of congress approved August 30, 1890, entitled “An Act to Apply a Portion of the Proceeds of the Public Lands to the More Complete Endowment and Support of the Colleges for the Benefit of Agriculture and the Mechanic Arts, Established Under the Provisions of an Act of Congress Approved July Second, Eighteen Hundred Sixty-two,” and all other money which shall be received by the state for the promotion of agriculture or the mechanic arts at land grant colleges under or by virtue of an act of congress shall, as and when received, be paid over to the treasurer of the university, to be used and applied and accounted for by the trustees and officers of the university, with the approval of the state controller, as required by the respective acts of congress under which the money is received.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 66, § 2; P.L. 1899, ch. 668, § 1; P.L. 1906, ch. 1353, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 1913, ch. 960, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1214, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2056, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 83, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-4

.

16-32-5.
Authority over experiment station.

The board of trustees shall have authority over the experiment station of the university located in the town of South Kingstown.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 84; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-5

; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-6.
Activities of experiment station.

The experiment station at the University of Rhode Island shall continue to expend sums of money received from the United States government for experimental work and agricultural extension service, and shall also continue to promote and encourage the work of farm bureaus and expend sums of money received from federal and state appropriations, subject to budgetary control provided by chapter 3 of title 35.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 84; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-6

.

16-32-7.
Duties required by federal acts — Annual report to general assembly.

The trustees and officers of the university shall perform all the duties and make, publish, distribute, and render all bulletins and reports required by the acts of congress or by any act in amendment of these or supplementary to these; and shall also report to the general assembly annually at its January session.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 66, § 2; P.L. 1899, ch. 668, § 1; P.L. 1906, ch. 1353, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 1913, ch. 960, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1214, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2056, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 83, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-7

.

16-32-8.
Policy as to pharmacy college education and intervention program related to the use and misuse of medication and alcohol by the elderly.

The general assembly declares that it views with favor and approves as a matter of public policy the establishment of a college of pharmacy within the University of Rhode Island to assume the educational functions of the Rhode Island College of Pharmacy and Allied Sciences.

The general assembly declares that there is a need for an education and intervention program related to the use of medication and alcohol by the elderly in elderly housing. The general assembly finds: (1) that the elderly population has the highest use of prescription medication, (2) that many elderly persons do not have an appropriate and complete understanding of their medication use and that the elderly need to improve their quality of life, maintain their ambulatory status, and identify specific medication and alcohol-related problems at an early stage.

The University of Rhode Island College of Pharmacy shall initiate an on-site support program for the elderly to foster the appropriate use and to help prevent the misuse of prescription medications and alcohol by the elderly. The program shall focus on both short-term intervention and long-term support. Pharmacists trained in the area of alcohol and drug use and misuse by the elderly shall be placed at a number of selected senior housing units within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3644, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-8

; P.L. 1988, ch. 650, § 1.

16-32-9.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem sufficient for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the university, the appropriation to be expended under the direction of the trustees and officers of the university. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the appropriations or so much of the sums that are necessary for the purposes appropriated, upon the receipt by him or her of proper vouchers as the board of trustees may by rule provide. The board shall receive, review, and adjust the budget for the university and present the budget under the requirements of §

35-3-4

.

Any tuition or fee increase schedules in effect for the university shall be received by the board of trustees for allocation for the fiscal year for which state appropriations are made to the board by the general assembly; provided that no further increases may be made by the board for the year for which appropriations are made.

All housing, dining, and other auxiliary facilities at the university shall be self-supporting and no funds shall be appropriated by the general assembly to pay operating expenses, including principal and interest on debt services, and overhead expenses for the facilities. Any debt service costs on general obligation bonds presented to the voters in November 2000 and November 2004 or appropriated funds from the Rhode Island capital plan fund or the housing auxiliaries at the university of Rhode Island shall not be subject to this self-supporting requirement in order to provide funds for the building construction and rehabilitation program.

The additional costs to achieve self-supporting status shall be by the implementation of a fee schedule of all housing, dining, and other auxiliary facilities, including but not limited to, operating expenses, principal, and interest on debt services, and overhead expenses.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (c) of this section or any provisions of this title, to the extent necessary to comply with the provisions of any outstanding bonds issued by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation or outstanding lease certificates of participation, in either case, issued for the benefit of the university of Rhode Island, the community college of Rhode Island, and/or Rhode Island college, to the extent necessary to comply with the provisions of any such bonds or certificates of participation, the general assembly shall annually appropriate any such sums it deems necessary from educational and general revenues (including, but not limited to tuition) and auxiliary enterprise revenues derived from the university of Rhode Island, the community college of Rhode Island and Rhode Island college, to be allocated by the council on postsecondary education or by the board of trustees, as appropriate, in accordance with the terms of the contracts with such bondholders or certificate holders.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 66, § 2; P.L. 1899, ch. 668, § 1; P.L. 1906, ch. 1353, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 1913, ch. 960, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1214, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2056, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 83, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-9

; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-10.
Award of degrees — Curriculum and government.

The board of trustees, with the approval of the president and a committee of the faculty of the university, shall award academic degrees and diplomas and confer honors in the same manner as is customary in American colleges. It shall also be the duty of the president and a committee of the faculty, with the approval of the board of trustees, to arrange courses of study conforming to all acts of Congress, and prescribe any qualifications for the admission of students and any rules of study, exercise, discipline, and government as the president and committee may deem proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 84; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-1

; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-11.
Power to guarantee loans.

The board of trustees is authorized and empowered to carry out the provisions of §§

16-32-12

through

16-32-14

in regard to the guaranty of loans made to societies and students at the university.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 84; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-11

; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-12.
Acquisition of land — Guaranty of loans to societies of students.

The board of trustees is authorized and empowered on behalf of the university of Rhode Island to acquire land and also to guarantee in the name of the state approved loans made to societies of students at the university, for the purchase or construction, upon lands owned by the university, of society houses which shall serve as student dormitories. Any loans approved, upon default, shall become state obligations in the same manner as any state bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2190, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 83, § 8; P.L. 1936, ch. 2295, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-12

; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-13.
Investment of state funds in student loans.

Any loans made to societies of students at the university under the terms and provisions of §§

16-32-12

and

16-32-15

shall be eligible for investment for the state investment commission of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2295, § 2; P.L. 1936, ch. 2379, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-13

; impl. am. P.L. 1958, ch. 164.

16-32-14.
Maximum guarantees outstanding.

The amount or amounts guaranteed and the amount or amounts guaranteed under the provisions of §

16-32-12

shall not at any one time exceed in the aggregate the sum of one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2190, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 83, § 9; P.L. 1925, ch. 582, § 1; P.L. 1931, ch. 1697, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1874, § 1; P.L. 1934, ch. 2128, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-14

; P.L. 1959, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 67, § 1.

16-32-15.
Assumption of defaulted obligations — Lien on property.

Whenever default is made on the part of a society in the payment of loans guaranteed under the provisions of §

16-32-12

, or any part of them, the board of trustees is authorized to assume the obligation and to make required payments on principal and interest from any of the appropriations available for the university of Rhode Island. In the event of a default, in cases where that board assumes the obligation of a society, the state shall have a lien subject to any mortgages or encumbrances existing at the time on any and all property of the society. The lien may be released after the reimbursement to the state of all payments made on behalf of the society, plus accrued interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1922, ch. 2190, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 83, § 10; P.L. 1936, ch. 2295, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-15

; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-16.
Marine biology department — Laboratory.

The University of Rhode Island is authorized and empowered to establish in connection with the university a department of marine biology. The department shall establish a marine biological laboratory with suitable facilities for research on problems involving animal life in Rhode Island waters. The department shall cooperate with the department of environmental management. The department shall, as facilities permit, offer courses for the training of students planning to enter the fishing industry or to qualify for positions in federal or state fishery departments. Courses in the department of marine biology shall have the same standing as other courses at the college and shall be accepted as credits for degrees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2470, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 20; P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-16

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

16-32-17.
Appropriations for marine biology.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary for maintaining the department of marine biology and the marine biological laboratory; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of the sum as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, (s.s.), ch. 2470, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 21; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

16-32-17

.

16-32-18.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3154, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 54, effective May 27, 1988.

16-32-19 — 16-32-24.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3154, § 2-7; G.L. 1956, §§

16-32-19

— 16-32-24; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 17, effective August 9, 1996.

16-32-25.
Establishment of college of pharmacy fund.

All money received pursuant to the provisions of chapter 3644 of the Public Laws of 1956 shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held by the general treasurer or by the university of Rhode Island foundation, as provided in §

16-32-26

, in a special fund the income of which shall be made available to the board of trustees to be applied by it solely for use as scholarship grants in the field of pharmacy and allied sciences, in any manner and under any conditions as the board of trustees for higher education may determine. The board of trustees for higher education is authorized and empowered, from time to time, as occasion may require, to draw on the general treasurer or on the university of Rhode Island foundation, for the annual income of the fund, or so much of this amount as may be necessary, to carry out this objective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 395, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-26.
Management of college of pharmacy fund.

The general treasurer shall have the care and management of the fund with full power to regulate the custody and safekeeping of all money and evidences of property belonging to the fund. The treasurer shall deposit, subject to his or her order, to the use of this fund, all dividends, interest, or income arising from it, in any bank or banks, trust company or trust companies, in which funds of the state may be lawfully kept. The treasurer may invest and reinvest, in his or her discretion, the money in the fund at any time and the dividends, interest, and income in any securities or investments in which the deposits in savings banks and participation deposits in banks and trust companies may be legally invested. The treasurer may change and vary the investments from time to time, and he or she may sell and dispose of any investments made, when necessary to meet the draft of the board of trustees as provided in §

16-32-25

.

The general treasurer shall, upon the order of the governor to do so, transfer to the university of Rhode Island foundation created by act of the general assembly at its January 1957 session all money and evidences of property comprising the fund, and then his or her duties with respect to the fund shall cease, and the foundation shall after this hold and administer the fund with all the powers and subject to all the duties imposed upon it by the act of the general assembly with respect to other funds held by the foundation; provided, that the fund shall be held by the foundation as a special fund and shall not be mingled with other funds held by the foundation, and the net income of the fund shall be devoted exclusively to the object specified in §

16-32-25

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 395, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 3.

16-32-27.
Establishment of landscaping fund.

All money received pursuant to the provisions of §

16-52-2(b)

shall be deemed to be trust funds for the benefit of the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the Community College of Rhode Island to be held by the general treasurer in a separate rotary fund for each institution which shall be made available to the presidents of the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, or the Community College of Rhode Island to be applied solely for the purpose of improving landscaping and/or parking facilities at the respective colleges as determined by the presidents of these colleges.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 262, § 2.

16-32-28.
Management of rotary fund.

The general treasurer shall have the care and management of each fund established pursuant to

16-32-27

with full power to regulate the custody and safekeeping of all money and evidences of property belonging to it. The general treasurer shall deposit, subject to his or her order, to the use of each fund, all dividends, interest, or income arising from it, in any bank or banks, trust company, or trust companies, in which funds of the state may be lawfully kept. The general treasurer may invest and reinvest in his or her discretion the money in each fund at any time and the dividends, interest, and income in any securities or investments in which the deposits in savings bank and participation deposits in banks and trust companies may be legally invested. The treasurer may change and vary investments from time to time, and he or she may sell and dispose of any investments made, when necessary to meet the draft of either the president of the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, or the Community College of Rhode Island as provided in §

16-32-27

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 262, § 2.

16-32-29.
Applied engineering laboratory.

The applied engineering laboratory building at the Kingston campus of the University of Rhode Island shall be officially named and known as the Chester H. Kirk Applied Engineering Laboratory.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 213, § 1.

16-32-30.
Geographic information system — Laboratory.

The University of Rhode Island is authorized and empowered to establish in connection with the university and within the department of natural resource sciences a geographic information system laboratory with suitable facilities for developing and maintaining a level of scientific and technical expertise in the use of computer technology in the management of land related natural resources. This will include maintaining a statewide data base of land related economic, physical, cultural, and natural resources and providing for controlled access of this database to the university community, other state, municipal, and federal departments and agencies, and the general public. The university shall, to the extent that facilities are available, offer courses for the training of students and the general public in methods and applications utilizing geographic information systems and shall perform applications research projects involving this technology at this laboratory. The university shall cooperate with and provide technical assistance to the division of planning of the department of administration in the management of the statewide geographic information system and shall advise other state, municipal, and federal departments and agencies and the general public in its use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 235, § 2.

16-32-31.
Appropriations for geographic information system laboratory.

The general assembly may annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary for maintaining the geographic information system laboratory within the department of natural resources sciences; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of the sum as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 235, § 2.

16-32-32.
Exemption from provisions of administrative procedures act.

The provisions of the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42, shall not apply to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-33.
Receipts from sources other than appropriations.

Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, all receipts from all sources other than state appropriations shall not be deposited into the general fund of the state, but shall be deposited by the general treasurer of the state into a restricted account for the benefit of the board of trustees, and shall be paid out by the treasurer upon the order of the board, without the necessity of appropriation or re-appropriation by the general assembly.

The board of trustees shall ensure that the university has a structure in place to prohibit the university from accepting funds that would interfere with or restrict academic freedom at the university. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed in a way as to prohibit a donor from earmarking funds for a particular purpose or use, including, but not limited to, research, scholarships, construction, or development.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.